Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB511.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 244.580 is amended to read as follows:
No brewer, distributor or transporter of malt beverages shall require by agreement or
otherwise, directly or indirectly or through an affiliate or subsidiary, that any retailer
engaged in the sale of malt beverages, purchase malt beverages from him or her to the
exclusion in whole or in part of malt beverages sold or offered for sale by other persons.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/11/2025 12:31 PM Jacketed